Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4599.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3a. As used in section 4: (a) âGift cardâ means a physical or digital closed-loop gift card or open-loop gift card that is either activated or inactivated. (b) âGift card redemption informationâ means information unique to each gift card that allows the cardholder to access, transfer, or spend the funds on the gift card. (c) âIssuerâ means a person that issues a gift card or the agent of the person with respect to that gift card. (d) âSellerâ means a merchant that is engaged in the business of selling gift cards to consumers. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4598 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor